Washington statutes.
RCW 18.110.020

Rights—Duties—Liabilities.

If an art dealer accepts a work of fine art on a fee, commission, or other compensation basis, on consignment from the artist:

(1) The art dealer is, with respect to that work of fine art, the agent of the artist.

(2) The work of fine art is trust property and the art dealer is trustee for the benefit of the artist until the work of fine art is sold to a bona fide third party.

(3) The proceeds of the sale of the work of fine art are trust property and the art dealer is trustee for the benefit of the artist until the amount due the artist from the sale is paid. These trust funds shall be paid to the artist within thirty days of receipt by the art dealer unless the parties expressly agree otherwise in writing. If the sale of the work of fine art is on installment, the funds from the installment shall first be applied to pay any balance due the artist on the sale, unless the artist expressly agrees in writing that the proceeds on each installment shall be paid according to a percentage established by the consignment agreement.

(4) The art dealer is strictly liable for the loss of or damage to the work of fine art while it is in the art dealer's possession. For the purpose of this subsection the value of the work of fine art is the value established in a written agreement between the artist and art dealer prior to the loss or damage or, if no written agreement regarding the value of the work of fine art exists, the fair market value of the work of fine art.

A work of fine art which is trust property when initially accepted by the art dealer remains trust property notwithstanding the subsequent purchase of the work of fine art by the art dealer directly or indirectly for the art dealer's own account until the purchase price is paid in full to the artist. No property which is trust property under this section is subject to the claims, liens, or security interests of the creditors of the art dealer.

[ 1981 c 33 s 2.]